Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
Judicial Retirement System for Judges and Commissioners
21.374.
Election by member participating in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan or the Judicial Retirement Plan on or after September 1, 2008, but before January 1, 2014 — Participation in hybrid cash balance plan — Private letter ruling — Administrative regulations.

Notwithstanding KRS

6.500

to

6.577

and

21.345

to

21.580

:

Subject to the provisions of this section, any member who began participating in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan or the Judicial Retirement Plan on or after September 1, 2008, but prior to January 1, 2014, may in lieu of the benefits he or she is currently eligible to receive under the plans, elect to receive the benefits and rights provided to members who began participating in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan or the Judicial Retirement Plan on or after January 1, 2014, including participating in the hybrid cash balance plan created pursuant to KRS

21.402

;

The election provided by this section shall be made in writing and on a form prescribed by the Judicial Form Retirement System board;

For each member who makes an election provided by this section:

Any service credit the member has accrued prior to January 1, 2014, shall be considered as service credit earned on or after January 1, 2014, for purposes of determining benefits under KRS

6.500

to

6.577

and

21.345

to

21.580

;

On the member’s effective election date, the value of the member’s accumulated contributions, less any interest, shall be deposited into the member’s hybrid cash balance account as provided by KRS

21.402

and considered part of the member’s accumulated account balance;

On the member’s effective election date, an employer pay credit as provided by KRS

21.402

shall be added to the member’s accumulated account balance for each month the member contributed to the Legislators’ Retirement Plan or the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to his or her effective election date; and

Interest credits as provided by KRS 21.402 shall only be applied for periods occurring on or after the member’s effective election date;

Before accepting an election provided by this section, the Judicial Form Retirement System board shall provide the member with information detailing the potential results of the member’s election;

An election made pursuant to this section shall be irrevocable; and

A member of the Legislators’ Retirement Plan or the Judicial Retirement Plan shall not be eligible to make an election prescribed by this section until the Judicial Form Retirement System receives a favorable private letter ruling from the Internal Revenue Service regarding this section.

If the Internal Revenue Service denies the request for a private letter ruling as provided by paragraph (a) of this subsection, this section shall be void.

The Judicial Form Retirement System may promulgate administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A in order to carry out this section.

HISTORY:

Repealed and reenacted by 2021 ch. 102, § 42, effective April 1, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(12/13/2018). On December 13, 2018, the Kentucky Supreme Court ruled that the passage of 2018 SB 151 (2018 Ky. Acts ch. 107), did not comply with the three-readings rule of Kentucky Constitution Section 46 and that the legislation is, therefore, constitutionally invalid and declared void. That ruling applies to changes made to this statute in that Act.

21.375.
Vesting through combined service credit.

A person who does not have the amount of service required for service retirement in the Judicial Retirement Plan but who is a member of that plan, or is a former member who has service credit therein in accordance with subsection (2) or (3) of KRS

21.460

, shall become vested in the Judicial Retirement Plan for benefits attributable to the amount of his actual service credit therein if such service credit, when combined with service credit which he has in, or for which he is receiving benefits from, the Legislators’ Retirement Plan, the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, County Employees Retirement System, State Police Retirement System, or Teachers’ Retirement System, is equal to the amount of service required for service retirement.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 60, § 2; 1978, ch. 193, § 4, effective July 1, 1978; 1982, ch. 458, § 1, effective April 15, 1982.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Once an individual retires and begins to draw benefits from one or more of the state retirement systems and is thereafter elected or appointed to a position covered by the Judicial Retirement System he cannot count the service credit in those other state retirement systems toward vesting in the Judicial Retirement System.

OAG 78-538

.

21.380.
Normal retirement age.

The normal retirement date or age of a member shall be his sixty-fifth birthday, except that the normal retirement age for a member who began participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, shall be reduced by one (1) year, but no more than five (5) years total, for:

Each five (5) years of service credit in the plan; and

Each year of service credit the member has earned beyond that needed to receive a retirement benefit of one hundred percent (100%) of final compensation.

KRS

21.350

to

21.480

do not require that a member retire at the normal retirement date.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 84, Art. III, § 4; 1962, ch. 9, § 5; 1994, ch. 266, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 2013, ch. 120, § 22, effective July 1, 2013.

21.385.
Payment of benefits while continuing in service — Options for member who began participating before January 1, 2014 — Multiple retirements by one person.

In a situation in which, by reason of federal tax law, the failure to commence the payment of retirement benefits to a vested member of the Kentucky Judicial Retirement Plan, by a specified date after the member reaches a specified age, as designated by the federal tax law, will result in the imposition of a special excise tax, the member, without retiring, shall be entitled, as of the specified date, to commence drawing from the plan the monthly benefit he or she would have been entitled to had he or she retired on that date. Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS

21.360

and

61.680

, a member who began participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, may, at his or her option, continue to be a participating member of the plan thereafter until he or she retires, or, may elect to cease to be a participating member of the plan, in which latter event he or she shall not be required to become a participating member of the Kentucky Employees Retirement System.

A member drawing benefits from the Kentucky Judicial Retirement Plan pursuant to subsection (1) of this section who elects to continue as a participating member of the plan, or a person drawing benefits from the plan by reason of having retired, who by reason of reemployment again becomes a participating member of the plan, shall continue to draw the benefits until he or she retires, and accrue additional benefits, but in the calculation of the additional benefits only the years of service after he or she commenced drawing the initial benefits shall be counted, and the monthly additional benefit shall not exceed such amount as, when added to the initial monthly benefit, will equal the final compensation on which the additional benefit was calculated. The member’s surviving spouse, if married to the member at the time of his or her ultimate retirement, shall be considered to be the surviving spouse with respect to both the additional and the initial benefits.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 299, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 2013, ch. 120, § 23, effective July 1, 2013; 2018 ch. 107, § 8, effective July 14, 2018; 2022 ch. 55, § 8, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(12/13/2018). On December 13, 2018, the Kentucky Supreme Court ruled that the passage of 2018 SB 151 (2018 Ky. Acts ch. 107), did not comply with the three-readings rule of Kentucky Constitution Section 46 and that the legislation is, therefore, constitutionally invalid and declared void. That ruling applies to changes made to this statute in that Act.

21.390.
Retirement defined. [Transferred.]

21.400.
Computation of retirement allowance for member who began participating before January 1, 2014 — Benefit reduction for early retirement.

A member who began participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, who retires on or after his normal retirement date shall receive a service retirement allowance, payable monthly during his lifetime, in an amount per month equal to two and seventy-five hundredths percent (2.75%) of his final compensation multiplied by the number of years of his service, but in no event to exceed one hundred percent (100%) of final compensation, except that for any service performed while a member prior to July 1, 1978, any service prior to July 1, 1962, creditable under KRS

21.345

, and any service performed in continued membership (or allowable under KRS

21.410

or

21.420

) after June 30, 1978, by a person who was a member on that date, the monthly percentage figure shall be five percent (5%) of his final compensation multiplied by the number of years of his service, and except that for any service performed by a member who elected membership at an annual accrual rate of four and fifteen one hundredths percent (4.15%) and for any service performed in continued membership thereafter (or allowable under KRS

21.410

to

21.420

), the benefit, payable monthly during his lifetime shall be an amount equal to four and fifteen one-hundredths percent (4.15%) of his final compensation multiplied by the number of years of his service, and except that allowances heretofore granted, and rights related thereto, shall not be affected by the 1978 or 1980 amendments to this section. For this purpose, “final compensation” means the average monthly compensation of the member for the sixty (60) months of service immediately preceding his retirement, including, in the case of a Circuit Judge, compensation received as special commissioner of the former Court of Appeals. If, at the time of retirement or death of a member his total period of service in one or more positions covered by the system has not amounted to sixty (60) months, his “final compensation” shall be computed as if he had served in the first position he occupied under the system for such period of time as to bring his total service (in all positions) to sixty (60) months. If that category of position was not in existence for that period, it shall be treated as though it had been in existence for that period and as if the compensation paid for the presumed period of existence was at the rate provided for the category when it in fact first was created.

A member who began participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, who retires before his normal retirement date shall be vested with the right to receive, when he reaches his normal retirement age, a service retirement allowance computed on the basis of the number of years of his actual service, and payable in accordance with:

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section; or

KRS

21.580

if the member retires as a Senior Status Special Judge while the pilot program created in KRS

21.580

is in effect.

In lieu of the right provided for in subsection (2) of this section, a member who began participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, who retires before his normal retirement age may elect, at any time before reaching his normal retirement age, to be paid commencing as of the time of the election a monthly service retirement allowance equal in amount to the monthly allowance that would have become payable under subsection (2) of this section when he reached his normal retirement age, reduced at the rate of five percent (5%) for each year by which his actual age at the time the election is made is lower than the normal retirement age.

A member who began participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, who retires before his normal retirement date when his benefit is based on twenty-seven (27) years or more of service in the Judicial Retirement Plan, or if his judicial service credit, when combined with service he has in, or for which he is receiving benefits from, the Legislators’ Retirement Plan, the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, County Employees Retirement System, State Police Retirement System, or the Teachers’ Retirement System, is equal to twenty-seven (27) years, shall be vested with the right to receive a service retirement allowance computed on the basis of the number of years of his actual service, and payable in accordance with:

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section; or

KRS

21.580

if the member retires as a Senior Status Special Judge while the pilot program created in KRS

21.580

is in effect.

In lieu of the right provided for in subsection (2) of this section, a member who began participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, who retires before his normal retirement age may elect, at any time before reaching his normal retirement age, to be paid commencing as of the time of the election, a monthly service retirement allowance equal in amount to the monthly allowance that would have become payable under subsection (2) of this section when he reached normal retirement age, reduced at the rate of five percent (5%) for each year by which his years of service or combined service pursuant to subsection (4) of this section are lower than twenty-seven (27).

Subsections (1) to (5) of this section shall not apply to members who begin participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan on or after January 1, 2014.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 84, Art. III, § 6; 1962, ch. 9, § 6, effective July 1, 1962; 1978, ch. 193, § 5, effective July 1, 1978; 1980, ch. 407, § 4, effective July 15, 1980; 1988, ch. 299, § 7, effective July 15, 1988; 1996, ch. 292, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 305, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2013, ch. 120, § 24, effective July 1, 2013.

21.402.
Hybrid cash balance plan for certain members of Legislators’ Retirement Plan and Judicial Retirement Plan — Member contributions and employer pay credits — Interest credits — Termination of employment — Options upon retirement — Individual members’ accounts established by board of Judicial Form Retirement System.

A member of the Legislators’ Retirement Plan or the Judicial Retirement Plan, whose participation in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan or the Judicial Retirement Plan begins on or after January 1, 2014, or a member making an election pursuant to KRS

21.374

, shall receive the retirement benefits provided by this section in lieu of the retirement benefits provided under KRS

6.520

and

21.400

. The retirement benefit provided by this section shall be known as the hybrid cash balance plan and shall operate as another benefit tier within the Legislators’ Retirement Plan and the Judicial Retirement Plan.

The hybrid cash balance plan shall provide a retirement benefit based upon the member’s accumulated account balance, which shall include:

Contributions made by the member as provided by KRS

6.500

to

6.577

and

21.345

to

21.580

, except for employee contributions prescribed by KRS 6.505(1)(d)2.b. and 21.360(1)(a)3.b.;

An employer pay credit of four percent (4%) of the creditable compensation earned by the employee for each month the employee is contributing to the hybrid cash balance plan provided by this section; and

Interest credits added annually to the member’s accumulated account balance as provided by this section.

Member contributions and employer pay credits as provided by subsection (2)(a) and (b) of this section shall be credited to the member’s account monthly as contributions are reported and posted to the plan.

Interest credits, as provided by subsection (2)(c) of this section, shall be credited to the member’s account annually on June 30 of each fiscal year, as determined by subsection (4) of this section.

On June 30 of each fiscal year, the plan shall determine if the member contributed to the hybrid cash balance plan during the fiscal year.

If the member contributed to the hybrid cash balance plan during the fiscal year, the interest credit added to the member’s account for that fiscal year shall be determined by multiplying the member’s accumulated account balance on June 30 of the preceding fiscal year by a percentage increase equal to:

Four percent (4%); plus

Seventy-five percent (75%) of the plan’s geometric average net investment return in excess of a four percent (4%) rate of return.

If the member did not contribute to the hybrid cash balance plan during the fiscal year, the interest credit added to the member’s account for that fiscal year shall be determined by multiplying the member’s accumulated account balance on June 30 of the preceding fiscal year by four percent (4%).

For purposes of this subsection, “plan’s geometric average net investment return”:

Means the annual average geometric investment return, net of administrative and investment fees and expenses, over the last five (5) fiscal years as of the date the interest is credited to the member’s account; and

Shall be expressed as a percentage and based upon the plan in which the member has an account.

Upon termination of employment, a member who has less than five (5) years of service credited under the Legislators’ Retirement Plan or the Judicial Retirement Plan, who elects to take a refund of his or her accumulated account balance as provided by KRS

21.460

, shall forfeit the accumulated employer credit, and shall only receive a refund of his or her accumulated contributions.

Upon termination of employment, a member who has five (5) or more years of service credited under the Legislators’ Retirement Plan or the Judicial Retirement Plan, who elects to take a refund of his or her accumulated account balance as provided by KRS

21.460

, shall receive a full refund of his or her accumulated account balance.

A member participating in the hybrid cash balance plan provided by this section may retire:

Upon reaching normal retirement age, provided he or she has earned five (5) or more years of service credited under the Legislators’ Retirement Plan or the Judicial Retirement Plan, or another state-administered retirement system; or

If the member is at least age fifty-seven (57) and has an age and years of service total of at least eighty-seven (87) years. The years of service used to determine eligibility for retirement under this paragraph shall only include years of service credited under the Legislators’ Retirement Plan or the Judicial Retirement Plan, or another state-administered retirement system.

A member eligible to retire under subsection (6) of this section may elect to:

Receive a monthly retirement allowance payable for life by having his or her accumulated account balance annuitized by the retirement plan in accordance with the actuarial assumptions and actuarial methods adopted by the board and in effect on the member’s retirement date;

Receive the actuarial equivalent of his or her retirement allowance calculated under paragraph (a) of this subsection payable under one (1) of the options set forth in KRS 21.420(8)(b); or

Take a refund of his or her accumulated account balance as provided by KRS

21.460

.

The board of the Judicial Form Retirement System shall establish individual members’ accounts for each member participating in the hybrid cash balance plan as provided by this section. The Judicial Form Retirement System may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to administer the provisions of this section.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to members who began participating in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan or the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, except for those members who make an election pursuant to KRS

21.374

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 120, § 12, effective July 1, 2013; 2016 ch. 12, § 5, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 125, § 5, effective March 27, 2017; 2018 ch. 107, § 9, effective July 14, 2018; 2022 ch. 55, § 9, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(12/13/2018). On December 13, 2018, the Kentucky Supreme Court ruled that the passage of 2018 SB 151 (2018 Ky. Acts ch. 107), did not comply with the three-readings rule of Kentucky Constitution Section 46 and that the legislation is, therefore, constitutionally invalid and declared void. That ruling applies to changes made to this statute in that Act.

21.405.
Increase of retirement benefits.

As of July 1, 1982, the board of trustees of the Kentucky Judicial Form Retirement System shall recompute the monthly benefits of persons then receiving benefits under the Judicial Retirement Plan, provided the person began participating in the plan prior to January 1, 2014, by using the same service credit rate and the same number of years of service that were used in computing the benefits then being received but substituting, in lieu of the “final compensation” that was used in the computation of the benefit then being received an amount equal to fifty-five percent (55%) of the final compensation of the office in which the credit was earned for a person retiring as of June 30, 1982.

As of July 1, 1983, and as of July 1 of each year thereafter, the board of trustees of the Kentucky Judicial Form Retirement System shall recompute the monthly benefits of persons then receiving benefits under the Judicial Retirement Plan, provided the person began participating in the plan prior to January 1, 2014, by using the following formula: two and three-fourths percent (2.75%) times fifty-five percent (55%) of the final compensation of the office in which the retirement credit was earned for a person retiring as of the recomputation date, times the number of years of service credit (not to exceed thirty-six (36) years).

In making the recomputations provided for in subsections (1) and (2) of this section for members who began participating in the plan prior to January 1, 2014, the same reduction factor, in case of an actuarially reduced benefit or a surviving spouse’s benefit, shall be used as was used in determining the benefit then being received. If the benefit as recomputed in accordance with subsection (1) or (2) of this section is higher than the benefit then being received, the recomputed benefit shall thereafter be paid monthly, commencing as of the date specified for the recomputation, subject to future adjustment at ensuing annual recomputations in accordance with subsection (2) of this section. For the purposes of this section, the following office equivalents shall be used: Judge of former Court of Appeals - Justice of Supreme Court; any position other than judge or justice that was covered by the Judicial Retirement System - Judge of the present Court of Appeals.

Effective August 1, 1998, to July 1, 2008, a recipient of a monthly pension benefit from the Kentucky Judicial Retirement Plan who began participating in the plan prior to January 1, 2014, shall have his or her benefit increased on July 1 of each year by the percentage increase in the annual average of the consumer price index for all urban consumers for the most recent calendar year as published by the Federal Bureau of Labor Statistics, not to exceed five percent (5%). In determining the state’s appropriation to the Judicial Retirement Fund, only the costs of increases granted as of the most recent valuation date shall be recognized. The benefits of this subsection as provided on August 1, 1998, to July 1, 2008, shall not be considered as benefits protected by the inviolable contract provisions of KRS

21.480

. The General Assembly reserves the right to suspend or reduce the benefits conferred in this subsection if in its judgment the welfare of the Commonwealth so demands.

Effective July 1, 2009, and on July 1 of each year thereafter, a recipient of a monthly pension benefit from the Kentucky Judicial Retirement Plan shall have his or her benefit increased by one and one-half percent (1.5%), if:

The funding level of the plan is greater than one hundred percent (100%) and subsequent legislation authorizes the use of any surplus actuarial assets to provide an increase in retirement allowances described by this subsection; or

The General Assembly appropriates sufficient funds to fully prefund the increase described by this subsection in the year the increase is provided.

The board of trustees of the Kentucky Judicial Form Retirement System shall, at least thirty (30) days prior to the beginning of regular sessions of the General Assembly held in even-numbered years, advise the General Assembly of the following:

Whether the plan has a funding level greater than one hundred percent (100%) and if the plan can support an increase in recipients’ retirement allowances as provided by paragraph (a) of this subsection over the next budget biennium without reducing the funding level of the plan below one hundred percent (100%); and

If no surplus actuarial assets are available, the level of funds needed to fully prefund an increase for plan recipients over the next budget biennium if a one and one-half percent (1.5%) increase is provided annually over the biennium.

For purposes of this subsection, “funding level” means the actuarial value of assets divided by the actuarially accrued liability expressed as a percentage that is determined and reported by the plan’s actuary in the plan’s actuarial valuation.

The full increase described by this subsection shall only be provided if the recipient has been receiving a benefit for at least twelve (12) months prior to the effective date of the increase. If the recipient has been receiving a benefit for less than (12) months prior to the effective date of the increase provided by this subsection, the increase shall be reduced on a pro rata basis for each month the recipient has not been receiving benefits in the twelve (12) months preceding the effective date of the increase.

In determining the state’s appropriation to the Judicial Retirement Fund, only the costs of increases granted as of the most recent valuation date shall be recognized.

The benefits of this subsection as provided on July 1, 2009, and thereafter shall not be considered as benefits protected by the inviolable contract provisions of KRS

21.480

. The General Assembly reserves the right to suspend or reduce the benefits conferred in this subsection if in its judgment the welfare of the Commonwealth so demands.

In addition to the increase to a recipient’s retirement allowance as provided by subsection (5) of this section, the General Assembly may, by subsequent legislation, provide supplemental increases to a recipient’s retirement allowance to help adjust for actual changes in the recipient’s cost of living if the General Assembly appropriates sufficient funds to fully prefund the benefit in the year the increase is provided.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 380, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 111, § 26, effective July 13, 1984; 1998, ch. 360, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2008 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 4, effective June 27, 2008; 2013, ch. 120, § 25, effective July 1, 2013; 2016 ch. 12, § 6, effective July 15, 2016.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/1/2013). This statute was amended by Section 25 of
2013 Ky. Acts ch. 120. Section 81 of that Act reads, “Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act to the contrary, the amendments in Sections 16, 25, and 69 of this Act shall in no way nullify the provisions of
2012 Ky. Acts ch. 19, Part I, 1.(4),
2012 Ky. Acts ch. 68, Part I, 2.(2), or
2012 Ky. Acts ch. 144, Part IV, 10., which suspended the cost-of-living adjustment that would have been provided to retirees and beneficiaries of the Legislative Retirement Plan, the Judicial Retirement Plan, the State Police Retirement System, the Kentucky Employees Retirement System, and the County Employees Retirement System on July 1, 2012, and July 1, 2013.”

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See Judicial Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 162, Pt. I, A, 2, (3) at 982.

21.410.
Disability retirement — Computation.

If upon examination of a member under his normal retirement age by one (1) or more qualified physicians employed by the retirement board, it is certified to the satisfaction of the board that such member is so physically or mentally disabled as to be incapacitated for further performance of duty, and that such incapacity is likely to be permanent, the member may retire for disability.

A member who began participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, who retires for disability as provided by this subsection shall be entitled to receive commencing immediately a disability retirement allowance, payable monthly during his disability, in an amount equal to one-half (1/2) of the monthly service retirement allowance he would have received commencing at his normal retirement date if he had continued in service until that date and had then retired, computed however on the basis of his final compensation at time of actual retirement.

A member who begins participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan on or after January 1, 2014, who retires for disability as provided by this subsection shall be entitled to a disability retirement allowance equal to the higher of twenty percent (20%) of the member’s monthly official salary or the retirement allowance determined in the same manner as for retirement at his or her normal retirement date under KRS

21.402

.

A member who begins participating in the Legislators’ Retirement Plan on or after January 1, 2014, who retires for disability as provided by this subsection shall be entitled to a disability retirement allowance equal to the higher of twenty percent (20%) of the member’s monthly creditable compensation or the retirement allowance determined in the same manner as for retirement at his or her normal retirement date under KRS

21.402

.

A member who began participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan prior to January 1, 2014, need not have completed eight (8) years of service in order to be eligible for benefits under subsection (1) of this section.

A member who begins participating in the Judicial Retirement Plan on or after January 1, 2014, must have completed at least five (5) years of service in order to apply and be eligible for the disability benefits provided by this section.

The retirement board shall cause a member who has been retired for disability and who is still under his normal retirement age to undergo periodic examination by one (1) or more qualified physicians employed by the board, to determine whether he continues to be incapacitated for service of the character required of a judge or commissioner. If upon any such examination it is certified to the satisfaction of the board that the member is no longer so incapacitated, or if the member refuses to submit to examination, the board shall terminate his disability retirement allowance. He shall then be entitled to such rights, if any, under subsection (2) or (3) of KRS

21.400

or under KRS

21.402

as he would have been entitled to had he voluntarily retired on the date he was retired for disability.

Upon reaching his normal retirement age, a member who began participating in the plan prior to January 1, 2014, and who has been receiving a disability retirement allowance may apply for and receive, in lieu thereof, the service retirement allowance he would have been entitled to receive at normal retirement age had he voluntarily retired on the date he was retired for disability.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 84, Art. III, § 7; 2013, ch. 120, § 26, effective July 1, 2013; 2016 ch. 12, § 7, effective July 15, 2016.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Where a Circuit Judge suffered a severe stroke just seven days before his term in office ended, the Judicial Retirement System could grant the judge disability retirement pursuant to this section, even though the medical certification and the subsequent determination to grant disability benefits were made after the date when the judge left office.

OAG 76-199

.

21.415.
Disability retirement benefits.

Retirement benefits for a Justice of the Supreme Court, Judge of the Court of Appeals, Circuit Judge, or District Judge retired for disability under Section 121 of the Constitution of Kentucky shall be in accordance with KRS

21.410

. The Judicial Retirement Board, in the case of such a retirement, shall exercise no function with respect to determining the existence or continuance of disability.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 60, § 3; 1978, ch. 193, § 6, effective July 1, 1978.